Utah statutes.
53B-14-102.   Mailing of notice of default -- Contents of notice.
(1)  Upon default in payment of a student loan or an installment payment on a
student loan, the entity responsible for collecting the loan may send a
notice, by certified mail, to the borrower at the borrower's last known
address.
(2)  The notice shall state the following:
(a)  the date and amount of the loan;
(b)  the balance of the loan;
(c)  the amount of delinquent installments and the dates they were due;
(d)  a demand for immediate payment of delinquent installments;
(e)  the right of the borrower to file a written response to the notice, to
have a hearing, to be represented at the hearing, and to appeal any decision
of the hearing examiner;
(f)  the time within which a written response must be filed; and
(g)  the power of the college, university, or board upon the failure of the
borrower to respond or upon a decision of the hearing examiner adverse to the
borrower, to obtain an order under this chapter and to execute upon income tax
overpayments or refunds of the borrower.
